Hawaii statutes.
§263-6 Collision of aircraft. The
liability of the owner of one aircraft to the owner of another aircraft, or to
aeronauts or passengers on either aircraft, for damage caused by collision on
land or in the air, shall be determined by the rules of law applicable to torts
on land. [L 1923, c 109, §6; RL 1925, §3896; RL 1935, §6980; RL 1945, §4926; RL
1955, §16-6; HRS §263-6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next